Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB181.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) Commencing with fiscal year 2027, except as
provided further, the maximum amount of expenditures and transfers from
the state general fund that may be authorized by an act of the legislature
during the 2026 regular session of the legislature, and each regular session
of the legislature thereafter, shall not exceed an amount equal to the total
amount of moneys authorized to be expended or transferred from the state
general fund during the immediately preceding fiscal year multiplied by an
amount equal to the consumer price index for all urban consumers in the
midwest region as published by the bureau of labor statistics of the United
States department of labor during the immediately preceding fiscal year
plus any percentage change in population in the preceding fiscal year as
established in K.S.A. 11-201, and amendments thereto.
(b) Such product shall be the maximum amount of expenditures and
transfers from the state general fund that may be authorized for such fiscal
year by an act of the legislature during the regular session of the
legislature. Annually, on or before September 1, the maximum amount for
the ensuing fiscal year shall be certified by the state treasurer in
consultation with the director of the budget and the director of legislative
research.
(c) If the multiplier established in subsection (b) is a negative
number, the total amount of moneys authorized to be expended or
transferred from the state general fund for the ensuing fiscal year shall not
exceed the total amount authorized in the immediately preceding fiscal
year.
(d) Commencing with fiscal year 2027, if the legislature or any
committee thereof, submits a draft of a legislative measure or measures
reflecting the legislature's budget for the ensuing fiscal year, such measure
or measures shall not exceed the maximum amount of expenditures and

SB 181 2
transfers from the state general fund certified by the state treasurer
pursuant to subsection (b).
(e) As used in this section, "transfer" shall include any demand
transfer, revenue transfer or any other transfer from the state general fund
to a state general fund account or any special revenue fund authorized by
law.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 75-3721 is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
3721. (a) On or before the eighth calendar day of each regular legislative
session, the governor shall submit the budget report to the legislature,
except that in the case of the regular legislative session immediately
following the election of a governor who was elected to the office of
governor for the first time, that governor shall submit the budget report to
the legislature on or before the 21st calendar day of that regular legislative
session.
(b) Subject to the provisions of subsection (i), the budget report of the
governor shall be set up in three parts, the nature and contents of which
shall include the following:
(1) Part one shall consist of a budget message by such governor,
including the governor's recommendations with reference to the fiscal
policy of the state government for the current fiscal year and the ensuing
fiscal year, describing the important features of the budget plan for each of
the fiscal years included, embracing a general budget summary setting
forth the aggregate figures of the budget so as to show the balanced
relation between the total proposed expenditures and the total anticipated
income for the current fiscal year and the ensuing fiscal year, with the
basis and factors upon which the estimates were made, and the means of
financing the budget plan for each of the fiscal years included, compared
with the corresponding figures for at least the last completed fiscal year,
and the director of the budget shall prepare the figures for the governor for
such comparisons.
(A) The budget plan shall not include: (i) Any proposed expenditures
of anticipated income attributable to proposed legislation that would
provide additional revenues from either current or new sources of revenue;
or (ii) any proposed expenditures of moneys in the ending balance in the
state general fund required by K.S.A. 75-6702, and amendments thereto.
(B) The general budget summary may be supported by explanatory
schedules or statements, classifying the expenditures contained therein by
state agencies, objects, and funds, and the income by state agencies, funds,
sources and types. The general budget summary shall include all special or
fee funds as well as the state general fund, and shall include the estimated
amounts of federal aids, for whatever purpose provided, together with
estimated expenditures therefrom.
(2) Part two shall embrace the detailed budget estimates for each of

SB 181 3
the fiscal years included, both of expenditures and revenues, showing the
requests of the state agencies, if any, and the governor's recommendations
thereon, which shall include amounts for payments by the state board of
regents pursuant to K.S.A. 75-4364, and amendments thereto. It Such
budget estimates shall also include statements of the bonded indebtedness
of the state, showing the actual amount of the debt service for at least the
last completed fiscal year, and the estimated amount for the current fiscal
year and for each of the ensuing fiscal years included, the debt authorized
and unissued, and the condition of the sinking funds.
(3) Part three shall consist of a draft of a legislative measure or
measures reflecting the governor's budget for all of the fiscal years
included in the budget report.
(c) The division of the budget shall compile a children's budget
document consisting of the information contained in agency budget
estimates regarding programs that provide services for children and their
families. Such document shall be provided to the Kansas children's cabinet
established by K.S.A. 38-1901, and amendments thereto, and other
persons or entities on request.
(d) The division of the budget, upon request, shall furnish the
governor or the legislature with any further information required
concerning the budget.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict or limit the
privilege of the governor to present supplemental budget messages or
amendments to previous budget messages, which may include proposals
for expenditure of new or increased sources of revenue derived from
proposed legislation.
(f) The budget estimate for the judicial branch of state government as
submitted to the director of the budget pursuant to K.S.A. 20-158, and
amendments thereto, shall be included in the governor's budget report.
(g) The division of the budget shall compile a Kansas homeland
security budget document consisting of the information contained in
agency budget estimates under K.S.A. 75-3717(a)(3), and amendments
thereto. Such document shall be provided to the house of representatives
committee on appropriations, the senate committee on ways and means
and such other committees upon request.
(h) Commencing with fiscal year 2018, the ending balance in the state
general fund in any fiscal year shall include the unexpended and
unencumbered balances in the:
(1) State general fund; and
(2) budget stabilization fund, established in K.S.A. 75-6706, and
amendments thereto.
(i) Commencing with the 2026 regular session of the legislature and
each regular session of the legislature thereafter, the governor shall

SB 181 4
submit a detailed budget plan and any legislative measure or measures for
the ensuing fiscal year that does not exceed the maximum amount of
expenditures and transfers from the state general fund certified by the
state treasurer pursuant to section 1(b), and amendments thereto.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 75-3721 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.